District of Columbia statutes.
50-906

Reorganization.

The Director of the DMV is authorized to organize the personnel and property transferred herein within any organizational unit of the DMV as the Director deems appropriate. Until such establishment, existing orders establishing the components of the pre-existing Department of Public Works remain in force, where they do not conflict with this chapter.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1827, 45 DCR 7193
1981 Ed., § 40-156.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 50-901.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1A, see notes following § 50-901.

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-901.

50-907. Ticket adjudication ombudsman.

(a)There is established within the Department an ombudsman for ticket adjudication, who shall report to the Director.

(b)The Mayor shall establish the qualifications of the ombudsman, which shall include a demonstrated ability through education or experience to analyze issues and matters of law, administration, and policy.

(c)The Mayor shall establish the duties of the ombudsman, including that the ombudsman shall:

(1)Receive complaints and concerns on the law, rules, policies, and procedures regarding the adjudication of moving violations, automated traffic enforcement violations, and parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian violations;

(2)Respond to complaints and concerns in a timely fashion with accurate and helpful information;

(3)Determine the validity of a complaint quickly and professionally;

(4)Generate options for a response, and offer a recommendation among the options;

(5)Make a referral to appropriate Department staff, when appropriate;

(6)Identify systemic concerns, including those raised by citizens, related to traffic adjudication;

(7)Recommend policy changes, staff training, and strategies to improve traffic adjudication; and

(8)Offer technical and procedural guidance; provided, that the ombudsman shall not render legal advice.

(d)The Ombudsman shall have access to the records and files of the Department as necessary to carry out the ombudsman’s duties and as allowed by federal and local law.

(e)The Ombudsman shall not be held personally liable or be subject to retaliatory action for the good-faith performance of duties, except that no immunity shall extend to criminal acts, or other acts that violate District or federal law.

(Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1828, as added July 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-127, § 2, 61 DCR 5711.)

For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-127, § 5, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 5 of D.C. Law 20-127, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7009, provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.